Illinois, session 104th, HB3754.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 356z.3b as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.3b new)7    Sec. 356z.3b. Statement of balance owed; use of collection 8agents.9    (a) When an insured person or policyholder requests, in 10writing, from the insurance issuer a confirmation of the 11current outstanding balance due from the insured person or 12policyholder, the insurance issuer may charge a fee of no more 13than $40 to provide that information. However, the fee amount 14must be reasonably related to the work and time required to 15confirm the total balance owed. This fee may only be charged 16one time per calendar year, unless the balance owed has 17changed between the time the first and any subsequent request 18was made.19    (b) Before an insurance issuer may turn an outstanding 20balance owed over to a collection agent, the insurance issuer 21must do all of the following:22         (1) Send a written communication to the insured 23    person or policyholder from whom the outstanding balance   HB3754- 2 -LRB104 12262 BAB 22374 b1    is owed, including a time frame on which payment must be 2    made. If the terms of the policy do not provide for this 3    time frame, a reasonable time frame may be set.4        (2) Allow the insured person or policyholder 7 5    calendar days after receipt of the written communication 6    to confirm receipt of the written communication and either 7    agree to pay or to request a different time frame for 8    payment.9        (3) Attempt in good faith to agree on a time frame for 10    the payment of all outstanding moneys. 11    (c) If an agreement to pay pursuant to subsection (b) is 12not reached within 7 calendar days after receipt of the 13written notice or payment is not made by the agreed-upon time 14frame, the insurance issuer may turn the delinquent account 15over to a collection agent.